Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 3 Georgia All-Payer Claims Database

Effective date. —

This article became effective August 5, 2020.

31-53-40.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the GAPCD.

“Advisory committee” means the GAPCD Advisory Committee established pursuant to Code Section 31-53-41.

“Claims data” means information included in an institutional, professional, or pharmacy claim or equivalent information transaction for a covered individual, including the amount paid to a provider of health care services plus any amount owed by the covered individual.

“Direct personal identifiers” means information relating to a covered individual that contains primary or obvious identifiers, such as the individual’s name, street address, email address, telephone number, and Social Security number, but does not include geographic or demographic information that would prohibit the identification of a covered individual.

“GAPCD” means the Georgia All-Payer Claims Database established pursuant to this article.

“Submitting entity” means:

An entity that provides health or dental insurance or a health or dental benefit plan in the state, including without limitation an insurance company, medical services plan, hospital plan, hospital medical service corporation, health maintenance organization, or fraternal benefit society, provided that the entity has covered individuals and the entity had at least 1,000 covered lives in the previous calendar year;

The Department of Community Health in the administration of Medicaid fee-for-service claims and the State Health Benefit Plan;

Medicaid care management organizations;

A health benefit plan offered or administered by or on behalf of the federal government with the agreement of the federal government;

Any other entity providing a plan of health insurance or health benefits subject to state insurance regulation, including, but not limited to a third-party administrator or pharmacy benefits manager, provided that the entity had at least 1,000 covered lives in the previous calendar year;

An entity that contracts with institutions of the Department of Corrections to provide medical, dental, or pharmaceutical care to inmates;

Any other health benefit plan offered or administered by or on behalf of the state or an agency or instrumentality of the state;

The State Board of Workers’ Compensation; and

The Georgia Access to Medical Cannabis Commission.

This term does not include an entity that provides health insurance or a health benefit plan that is accident-only, specified disease, hospital indemnity, long-term care, disability income, or other supplemental benefit coverage.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-41.
GAPCD Advisory Committee established; membership; terms; meeting; reimbursement for expenses; appointment of nonvoting members.

There is established the GAPCD Advisory Committee for the purpose of making recommendations regarding the creation of the framework and implementation plan for the GAPCD to facilitate the reporting of health care and health quality data resulting in transparent and public reporting of safety, quality, cost, and efficiency information at all levels of health care. The advisory committee shall consist of the following members:

The director, who shall serve as chairperson;

The chairperson of the Senate Appropriations Community Health Subcommittee;

The chairperson of the House Appropriations Health Subcommittee;

The director of the Office of Planning and Budget, or his or her designee;

One member from the hospital industry to be appointed by the Governor;

One member from the health care philanthropic community to be appointed by the Governor;

One member from the insurance industry to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

One member who is a medical provider to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor;

The commissioner of public health, or his or her designee;

The commissioner of community health, or his or her designee;

The Commissioner of Insurance, or his or her designee; and

The director of the Center for Health Analytics and Informatics of the Georgia Institute of Technology.

The members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (5), (6), (7), and (8) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed no later than October 1, 2020; provided, however, that the advisory committee shall be operational and shall conduct its work even if one or more of such members is not timely appointed. Appointed members of the advisory committee shall each serve for a term of two years. A vacancy in an appointed seat shall be filled by appointment for the remainder of the term, and each appointing authority retains the right to reappoint members whose terms of appointment have expired.

The advisory committee shall meet at the call of the chairperson and shall meet at least quarterly.

Members of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses as provided in Code Section 45-7-21.

The director shall be authorized to appoint ad hoc nonvoting members to the advisory committee, convene one or more panels, and consult with experts when expertise is deemed necessary in the performance of the functions of the advisory committee.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-42.
Initial recommendations requirements; ongoing recommendations; evaluations.

The advisory committee shall make initial recommendations to the director no later than March 1, 2021, regarding the creation and operation of a state all-payer claims database, to be known as the GAPCD, that:

Include specific strategies to measure and collect data related to health care safety and quality, utilization, health outcomes, and cost;

Focus on data elements that foster quality improvement and peer group comparisons;

Facilitate value based, cost-effective purchasing of health care services by public and private purchasers and consumers;

Result in usable and comparable information that allows public and private health care purchasers, consumers, and data analysts to identify and compare health plans, health insurers, health care facilities, and health care providers regarding the provision of safe, value based, cost-effective, high-quality health care services;

Use and build upon existing data collection standards and methods to establish and maintain the GAPCD in a cost-effective and efficient manner;

Are designed to measure the following performance domains: safety, timeliness, effectiveness, efficiency, equity, and patient-centeredness;

Incorporate and utilize claims, eligibility, and other publicly available data to the extent it is the most cost-effective method of collecting data to minimize the cost and administrative burden on data sources;

Include recommendations about whether to include data on the uninsured;

Address the harmonization of the GAPCD with other states’, regions’, and federal efforts concerning all-payer claims databases;

Address the harmonization of the GAPCD with federal legislation concerning an all-payer claims database;

Address a limit on the number of times the administrator may require submission of the required data elements;

Address a limit on the number of times the administrator may change the required data elements for submission in a calendar year considering administrative costs, resources, and time required to fulfill the requests; and

Address compliance with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended, and other proprietary information related to collection and release of data.

The advisory committee shall make ongoing recommendations to the director to ensure the operations and design of the GAPCD continue to be effective and meet the objectives of the GAPCD.

The advisory committee shall conduct an evaluation of the GAPCD at least every five years to ensure that the purposes are met.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-43.
Funding; beginning of operations.

The director shall seek funding for the creation of the all-payer health claims database and develop a plan for the financial stability of the GAPCD. No later than March 15, 2021, the director shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the status of the funding effort and on the status of the recommendations of the advisory committee. The report shall include the final data elements recommended by the advisory committee, the final provisions contemplated to comply with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended, and any other final recommendations that are ready at the time of the report.

If sufficient funding is received through gifts, grants, and donations or through appropriations on or before January 1, 2022, as determined by the director, the administrator shall, in consultation with the advisory committee, create the GAPCD in accordance with this article.

The GAPCD shall be operational no later than January 1, 2023.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-44.
Objectives and use of GAPCD.

The objectives of the GAPCD shall be to facilitate data-driven, evidence-based improvements in access, quality, and cost of health care and to promote and improve public health through the understanding of health care expenditure patterns and operation and performance of the health care system. Specific uses of the GAPCD include, but are not limited to:

Establishing baseline health care cost information;

Monitoring and analyzing health care costs;

Assessing population health;

Measuring utilization of health care services;

Identifying health disparities;

Informing consumers of cost and quality of health care;

Supporting the planning and evaluation of health care operations and care;

Improving coordination of care;

Enabling oversight of health insurance premium medical loss ratios; and

Conducting waste, fraud, and abuse studies.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-45.
Role of administrator.

The administrator of the GAPCD shall be the Center for Health Analytics and Informatics of the Georgia Institute of Technology. The administrator, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall:

Determine the data to be collected from submitting entities and the method of collection, including mandatory and voluntary reporting of health care and health quality data;

Seek to establish agreements for voluntary reporting of health care claims data from health care payers that are not subject to mandatory reporting requirements in order to ensure availability of the most comprehensive and systemwide data on health care costs and quality;

Seek to establish agreements or requests with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to obtain Medicare health claims data;

Determine the measures necessary to implement the reporting requirements in a manner that is cost-effective and reasonable for data sources and timely, relevant, and reliable for public and private health care purchasers and consumers, providers, and policymakers;

Determine the reports and data to be made available to the public with recommendations from the advisory committee in order to accomplish the purposes of this Code section, including conducting studies and reporting the results of the studies;

Collect, aggregate, distribute, and publicly report performance data on quality, health outcomes, health disparities, cost, utilization, and pricing in a manner accessible for public and private health care purchasers and consumers, providers, and policymakers;

Protect patient privacy in compliance with state and federal health record confidentiality laws while preserving the ability to analyze data and share with providers and submitting entities to ensure accuracy prior to the public release of information;

Report to the Governor and the General Assembly on or before March 1 of each year on the status of implementing the GAPCD and any recommendations for statutory or regulatory changes, with input from the advisory committee, that would advance the purposes of this article; and

Provide leadership and coordination of public and private health care quality and performance measurements to ensure efficiency, cost-effectiveness, transparency, and informed choice by public and private health care purchasers and consumers.

The administrator, with input from the advisory committee, shall:

Incorporate and utilize publicly available data other than administrative claims data, if necessary, to measure and analyze a significant health care quality, safety, or cost issue that cannot be adequately measured with administrative claims data alone;

Require submitting entities to submit data necessary to implement the GAPCD; and

Determine the data elements to be collected, the reporting formats for data submitted, and the use and reporting of any data submitted. Data collection shall align with national, regional, and other uniform all-payer claims databases’ standards when possible.

The administrator, with input from the advisory committee, may:

Audit the accuracy of all data submitted;

Contract with third parties to collect and process the health care data collected pursuant to this article. The contract shall prohibit the collection of unencrypted social security numbers and the use of the data for any purpose other than those specifically authorized by the contract. The contract shall require the third party to transmit the data collected and processed under such contract to the administrator or other designated entity; and

Share data regionally or help develop a multistate effort if recommended by the advisory committee.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-45

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-46.
Design criteria.

The advisory committee and the administrator should consider the following design criteria:

Allowing the use of federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 compliant, government level secured cloud computing resources to save funding;

Ensuring all inbound data is converted to a common standard and ensuring that data quality checks are done on inbound data;

Requiring all communications to and from the database to use encryption and IP whitelisting where appropriate;

Providing industry standard interfaces for accessing the data from approved users;

Grouping the data in ways to match the relevant cohorts of interest; and

Insuring that at no point does any personally identifiable information reside in the database.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-46

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-47.
Submission of claims; personal identification data not public record.

Beginning in January, 2023, and every month thereafter, all submitting entities shall submit claims data for state residents to the GAPCD in accordance with this article and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article.

Submitting entities shall submit 95 percent of data within 60 days from the day that the adjudicated claims were paid, and 100 percent of data within 180 days from the day adjudicated claims were sent for payment. The administrator shall establish a Data Submission Guide to ensure uniformity of data, which may be based on currently existing data standards, such as the National Council for Prescription Drug Programs (NCPDP) and ASC X12 Post Adjudicated Claims Data Reporting (PACDR).

Self-funded employer sponsored plans may voluntarily submit monthly claims data to the GAPCD when the employer has opted in writing to the submission of the data. The carrier or administrator shall notify the employer of the employer’s option to authorize the submission of the data.

Direct personal identifiers contained in claim data submitted pursuant to this article shall not be considered a public record and shall not be subject to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50, relating to open records.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-47

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-48.
Operation of GAPCD.

The GAPCD shall be designed to:

Provide access to the public through a public portal, contingent on funding, in a form and manner that ensures the privacy and security of personal health information as required by state and federal law, as a resource to insurers, consumers, employers, providers, purchasers of health care, and state agencies to allow for continuous review of health care utilization, expenditures, and quality and safety performance in this state;

Provide access through memoranda of understanding and after consultation with the advisory committee to the Department of Community Health, Department of Public Health, Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, and other departments of state government for the purposes of objectives and uses included in Code Section 31-53-44;

Provide for custom data requests from communities, individuals, researchers, organizations, and private companies, subject to rules promulgated by the office;

Allow for comparisons of geographic, demographic, and economic factors and institutional size; and

Present data in a consumer-friendly manner.

The collection, storage, and release of health care data and other information pursuant to this article shall be subject to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-48

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

U.S. Code.

The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, referred to in subsection (b), is codified at 42 U.S.C. Section 1320d et seq.

31-53-49.
Requirements for annual report.

The administrator shall prepare an annual report to include:

Any policies established or revised pursuant to state and federal medical privacy laws, including the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended;

The number of requests for data and reports from the GAPCD, whether the request was submitted by a state agency or private entity, the purpose of the project, a list of the requests for which the administrator was advised that the release was consistent with rule and the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended, and a list of the requests not recommended for release;

For each request recommended, the administrator must provide the federal regulation pursuant to which the use or disclosure was recommended, and whether a data use agreement or limited data set data use agreement was executed for the use or disclosure;

A description of any data breaches, actions taken to provide notifications, if applicable, and actions taken to prevent a recurrence;

The uses of the data in the GAPCD;

Public studies produced by the administrator;

The cost of administering the GAPCD, the sources of the funding, and the total revenue taken in by the GAPCD;

The recipients of the data, the purposes of the data requests, and whether a fee was charged for the data; and

A fee schedule displaying the fees for providing custom data reports from the GAPCD.

Such annual report for the previous calendar year shall be provided no later than March 1 to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the chairperson of the House Committee on Health and Human Services, and the chairperson of the Senate Health and Human Services Committee.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-49

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

U.S. Code.

The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, referred to in this Code section, is codified at 42 U.S.C. Section 1320d et seq.

31-53-50.
Penalties for noncompliance.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, any submitting entity that fails to submit claims data in accordance with this article shall be subject to penalty. The office shall adopt a schedule of penalties not to exceed $1,000.00 per day of violation, determined by the severity of the violation. A penalty imposed under this subsection may be remitted or mitigated upon such terms and conditions as the director considers proper and consistent with the public health and safety. Any fines collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the state treasury.

Any submitting entity that is subject to the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Insurance that fails to submit claims data in accordance with this article shall be subject to violation of paragraph (14.2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 33-6-4, and any other penalties that may be imposed by the Commissioner of Insurance. The GAPCD may refer violations by such submitting entities to the Commissioner of Insurance for enforcement action for each instance in which such submitting entity fails to submit claims data to the GAPCD in accordance with this article. The rules promulgated pursuant to Code Section 31-53-51, shall include processes for referring violations to the Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to this subsection.

This Code section shall not apply to state or federal agencies that are submitting entities.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-51.
Regulatory authority.

The office shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-52.
Impact of insufficient funding.

If at any time it is determined that there is not sufficient funding to finance the ongoing operations of the GAPCD, the GAPCD shall cease operating and the advisory committee and administrator shall no longer have the duty to carry out the functions required pursuant to this article. If the GAPCD ceases to operate, any data submitted shall be destroyed or returned to its original source.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.

31-53-53.
Reporting exemption for self-funded employer or plan sponsor.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to impose any reporting obligation on any self-funded employer or plan sponsor, or to impose any requirement with respect to the manner in which any such self-funded plan is administered. Nothing in this article shall prevent an insurer or third-party administrator from communicating its views to an employer about the employer’s decision whether to opt into the submission of claims data.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-53-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 743, § 1/SB 482.